Utah statutes.
78B-6-1201.   Partition -- By cotenants of real property.

A person who is a joint tenant or tenant in common with another of real property may bring an action to partition the property for the benefit of each tenant.  An action for partition may require the sale of the property if it appears that the partition cannot be made without prejudice to the owners.

